Florida, session 2026, HB1299.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 364.242, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1299-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1299 2026
364.242 Misleading or inaccurate caller identification.—
(1) A person may not, in connection with a
telecommunications company, cause a caller identification
service as defined in s. 365.176 to knowingly transmit
misleading or inaccurate caller identification information with
the intent to defraud, cause harm, or wrongfully obtain anything
of value.
(2) A telecommunications company must provide the
telephone number and location from which each telephone call
originates and must block all telephone calls and text messages
that contain manipulated caller identification information that
does not match such telephone number or location.
(3) This section does not apply to transmissions in
connection with:
(a) Any authorized activity of a law enforcement agency;
or
(b) A court order that specifically authorizes
manipulation of caller identification information.

The commission shall determine additional exemptions from this
section as it deems appropriate.
(4) A telecommunications company may be held civilly
liable and, notwithstanding s. 364.285(1), subject to a penalty
of $250,000 if it is found to be in violation of this section.
Section 2. Section 364.243, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1299-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1299 2026
to read:
364.243 Authentication framework implementation.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "STIR/SHAKEN
authentication framework" means the Secure Telephone Identity
Revisited (STIR) and Signature-based Handling of Asserted
Information Using toKENs (SHAKEN) standards proposed by the
information and communications technology industry.
(2) By July 1, 2027, the commission shall require every
telecommunications company to implement the STIR/SHAKEN
authentication framework or alternative technology that provides
comparable or superior capability to verify and authenticate
caller identification information in the Internet protocol
networks of the telecommunications company.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
telecommunications company shall file a certification with the
Federal Communications Commission that the company's traffic is
either digitally verified by the STIR/SHAKEN authentication
framework or subject to a compliant automated call mitigation
program. The company shall provide a copy of such certification
to the Attorney General or the commission upon request.
(4) A telecommunications company may be held civilly
liable and, notwithstanding s. 364.285(1), subject to a penalty
of $250,000 if it is found to be in violation of this section.
Section 3. Subsection (4) of section 365.176, Florida
Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (5) and amended, and a new
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1299-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1299 2026
subsection (4) is added to that section, to read:
365.176 Florida Call-Blocking Act.—
(4) Under s. 364.242, providers must block calls that
contain manipulated caller identification information that does
not match the originating number or location of the call.
(5)(4) For purposes of blocking calls from certain
originating numbers as authorized and required in this section,
a provider may rely on caller identification service information
provided by the pooling administrator to determine the
originating number.
Section 4. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1299-00